Illinois, session 104th, HB4990.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher 5Education Act is amended by changing Sections 5, 10, 15, 20, 625, and 30 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 155/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Awareness programming" means institutional action 10designed to communicate the prevalence of sexual violence, 11including without limitation training, poster and flyer 12campaigns, electronic communications, films, guest speakers, 13symposia, conferences, seminars, or panel discussions.14    "Bystander intervention" includes without limitation the 15act of challenging the social norms that support, condone, or 16permit sexual violence.17    "Complainant" means a student who files a complaint 18alleging violation of the comprehensive policy through the 19higher education institution's complaint resolution procedure.20    "Comprehensive policy" means a policy created and 21implemented by a higher education institution to address 22student allegations of sexual violence, domestic violence, 23dating violence, and stalking, and sexual harassment.  HB4990 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    "Complaint advisor" means a person chosen by a complainant 2or respondent to advise the complainant or respondent 3regarding the complaint resolution procedure, who may 4accompany the complainant or respondent to any meeting, 5interview, or hearing with the individual or individuals who 6will resolve a complaint related to an alleged violation of 7the comprehensive policy and who may be appointed by a higher 8education institution for a party at the request of that 9party. "Complaint advisor" includes, but is not limited to, an 10attorney. "Complaint advisor" does not include a complainant's 11confidential advisor, unless the complainant requests that the 12confidential advisor serve as the complainant's complaint 13advisor and the confidential advisor agrees to serve as such. 14    "Confidential advisor" means a person who is employed or 15contracted by a higher education institution to provide 16emergency and ongoing support to student survivors of sexual 17violence, domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, and 18sexual harassment, with the training, duties, and 19responsibilities described in Section 20 of this Act. 20"Confidential advisor" does not include a complainant's 21complaint advisor, unless the complainant requests that the 22confidential advisor serve as the complainant's complaint 23advisor and the confidential advisor agrees to serve as such. 24    "Dating violence" means any act of abuse committed by a 25person who is or has been in a romantic or intimate 26relationship with a survivor.  HB4990 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    "Digital sexual harassment" means technology-facilitated 2abusive acts, including, but not limited to, repeated, 3unwelcome electronic communications based on sex or containing 4sexually-explicit material, and actual or threatened 5dissemination of a private or digitally altered sexual image 6without the depicted individual's consent, as defined in 7Section 5 of the Civil Remedies for Nonconsensual 8Dissemination of Private Sexual Images Act.9    "Domestic violence" means any act of abuse as defined in 10the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 1986. 11    "Higher education institution" means a public university, 12a public community college, or an independent, not-for-profit 13or for-profit higher education institution located in this 14State.15    "Lack of capacity" means an inability to give knowing and 16affirming consent. 17    "Primary prevention programming" means institutional 18action and strategies intended to prevent sexual violence 19before it occurs by means of changing social norms and other 20approaches, including without limitation training, poster and 21flyer campaigns, electronic communications, films, guest 22speakers, symposia, conferences, seminars, or panel 23discussions.24    "Respondent" means a student involved in the complaint 25resolution procedure who has been accused of violating a 26higher education institution's comprehensive policy.  HB4990 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    "Retaliation" means any action taken against a person, 2including, but not limited to, intimidation, threats, 3coercion, or discrimination, to purposefully or knowingly 4interfere with any right or privilege secured by this Act or 5Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 because 6that person reported information, made a complaint, testified, 7assisted, or participated or refused to participate in any 8manner in an investigation, proceeding, or hearing, including 9in an informal resolution process. "Retaliation" includes 10actions by a student, a higher education institution, an 11employee or other individual authorized by a higher education 12institution to provide aid, a benefit, or a service under an 13education program or activity of the higher education 14institution, or a third party acting on behalf of a higher 15education institution or a respondent. 16    "Sexual harassment" means unwelcome sex-based conduct, 17including, but not limited to, unwanted sexual advances, 18unwanted requests for sexual favors, or any unwanted verbal, 19nonverbal, or physical conduct that is sex-based or that is 20related to a person's sex, sexual orientation, or gender 21identity, toward a student that (i) a reasonable person would 22view as substantially interfering with the student's 23educational performance or participation in a program or 24activity of a higher education institution, including, but not 25limited to, any mental or physical health impacts, any new or 26increased challenges with focusing on academics or activities,   HB4990 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1any fear or anxiety about attending class or activities, or 2the need to alter routines or class or activity schedules to 3avoid another student, or (ii) creates an environment that a 4reasonable person would consider to be intimidating, hostile, 5or offensive. "Sexual harassment" includes digital sexual 6harassment. 7    "Sexual violence" means physical sexual acts attempted or 8perpetrated against a person's will or when a person is 9incapable of giving consent, including without limitation 10rape, sexual assault, sexual battery, sexual abuse, and sexual 11coercion.12    "Stalking" has the meaning given to that term in the 13Stalking No Contact Order Act. 14    "Survivor" means a student enrolled at a higher education 15institution who has self-identified as having experienced 16sexual violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or 17stalking, or sexual harassment while enrolled at a higher 18education institution.19    "Survivor-centered" means a systematic focus on the needs 20and concerns of a survivor of sexual violence, domestic 21violence, dating violence, or stalking, or sexual harassment 22that (i) ensures the compassionate and sensitive delivery of 23services in a nonjudgmental manner; (ii) ensures an 24understanding of how trauma affects survivor behavior; (iii) 25maintains survivor safety, privacy, and, if possible, 26confidentiality; and (iv) recognizes that a survivor is not   HB4990 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1responsible for the sexual violence, domestic violence, dating 2violence, or stalking, or sexual harassment.3    "Trauma-informed response" means a response involving an 4understanding of the complexities of sexual violence, domestic 5violence, dating violence, or stalking, or sexual harassment 6through training centered on the neurobiological impact of 7trauma, the influence of societal myths and stereotypes 8surrounding sexual violence, domestic violence, dating 9violence, or stalking, or sexual harassment, and understanding 10the behavior of perpetrators. "Trauma-informed response" 11includes empowering survivors to make their own decisions 12regarding care, healing, supportive measures, and whether to 13report or engage with systems and then supporting those 14decisions. 15(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15.) 16    (110 ILCS 155/10)17    Sec. 10. Comprehensive policy. 18    (a) All On or before August 1, 2016, all higher education 19institutions shall adopt a comprehensive policy concerning 20sexual violence, domestic violence, dating violence, and 21stalking, and sexual harassment consistent with governing 22federal and State law. The higher education institution's 23comprehensive policy shall include, at a minimum, all of the 24following components:25        (1) A definition of consent that, at a minimum,   HB4990 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    recognizes that (i) consent is a freely given agreement to 2    sexual activity, (ii) a person's lack of verbal or 3    physical resistance or submission resulting from the use 4    or threat of force does not constitute consent, (iii) a 5    person's manner of dress does not constitute consent, (iv) 6    a person's consent to past sexual activity does not 7    constitute consent to future sexual activity, (v) a 8    person's consent to engage in sexual activity with one 9    person does not constitute consent to engage in sexual 10    activity with another, (vi) a person can withdraw consent 11    at any time, and (vii) a person cannot consent to sexual 12    activity if that person is unable to understand the nature 13    of the activity or give knowing consent due to 14    circumstances, including without limitation the following:15            (A) the person has a lack of capacity is 16        incapacitated due to the use or influence of alcohol 17        or drugs;18            (B) the person is asleep or unconscious;19            (C) the person is under age; or20            (D) the person has a lack of capacity is 21        incapacitated due to a mental disability.22        Nothing in this Section prevents a higher education 23    institution from defining consent in a more demanding 24    manner.25        (2) Procedures that students of the higher education 26    institution may follow if they choose to report an alleged   HB4990 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    violation of the comprehensive policy, regardless of where 2    the incident of sexual violence, domestic violence, dating 3    violence, or stalking, or sexual harassment occurred, 4    including all of the following:5            (A) Name and contact information for the Title IX 6        coordinator, campus law enforcement or security, local 7        law enforcement, and the community-based sexual 8        assault crisis center.9            (B) The name, title, and contact information for 10        confidential advisors and other confidential resources 11        and a description of what confidential reporting 12        means.13            (C) Information regarding the various individuals, 14        departments, or organizations to whom a student may 15        report a violation of the comprehensive policy, 16        specifying for each individual and entity (i) the 17        extent of the individual's or entity's reporting 18        obligation, (ii) the extent of the individual's or 19        entity's ability to protect the student's privacy, and 20        (iii) the extent of the individual's or entity's 21        ability to have confidential communications with the 22        student.23            (D) An option for students to electronically 24        report.25            (E) An option for students to anonymously report.26            (F) An option for students to confidentially   HB4990 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1        report.2            (G) An option for reports by third parties and 3        bystanders. However, while third parties and 4        bystanders may report, the higher education 5        institution may not compel a survivor's participation 6        in a complaint resolution procedure. 7            (H) Information about how the higher education 8        institution prohibits and responds to retaliation and 9        the process for reporting retaliation under the 10        comprehensive policy. 11        (3) The higher education institution's procedure for 12    responding to a report of an alleged incident of sexual 13    violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking, 14    or sexual harassment, including without limitation (i) 15    assisting and interviewing the survivor, (ii) identifying 16    and locating witnesses, (iii) contacting and interviewing 17    the respondent, (iv) contacting and cooperating with law 18    enforcement, when applicable, and (v) providing 19    information regarding the importance of preserving 20    physical evidence of the sexual violence and the 21    availability of a medical forensic examination at no 22    charge to the survivor, and (vi) providing information 23    about how the higher education institution prohibits and 24    responds to retaliation and the process for reporting 25    retaliation under the comprehensive policy.26        (4) A statement of the higher education institution's   HB4990 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    obligation to provide survivors with concise information, 2    written in plain language, concerning the survivor's 3    rights and options, upon receiving a report of an alleged 4    violation of the comprehensive policy, as described in 5    Section 15 of this Act.6        (5) The name, address, and telephone number of the 7    medical facility nearest to each campus of the higher 8    education institution where a survivor may have a medical 9    forensic examination completed at no cost to the survivor, 10    pursuant to the Sexual Assault Survivors Emergency 11    Treatment Act.12        (6) The name, telephone number, address, and website 13    URL, if available, of community-based, State, and national 14    sexual assault crisis centers.15        (7) A statement notifying survivors of the interim 16    protective and supportive measures and accommodations 17    reasonably available from the higher education institution 18    that a survivor may request in response to an alleged 19    violation of the comprehensive policy, including without 20    limitation changes to academic, living, dining, 21    transportation, and working situations, obtaining and 22    enforcing campus no contact orders, and how the higher 23    education institution supports the honoring of an order of 24    protection or no contact order entered by a State civil or 25    criminal court.26        (8) The higher education institution's complaint   HB4990 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    resolution procedures if a student alleges violation of 2    the comprehensive violence policy, including, at a 3    minimum, the guidelines set forth in Section 25 of this 4    Act.5        (9) A statement of the range of sanctions the higher 6    education institution may impose following the 7    implementation of its complaint resolution procedures in 8    response to an alleged violation of the comprehensive 9    policy. Sanctions may include, but are not limited to, 10    suspension, expulsion, or removal of the student found, 11    after complaint resolution procedures, to be in violation 12    of the comprehensive policy of the higher education 13    institution. 14        (10) A statement of the higher education institution's 15    obligation to include an amnesty provision that provides 16    immunity to any student who reports, in good faith, an 17    alleged violation of the higher education institution's 18    comprehensive policy to a responsible employee, as defined 19    by federal law, so that the reporting student will not 20    receive a disciplinary sanction by the institution for a 21    student conduct violation, such as underage drinking or 22    possession or use of a controlled substance, that is 23    revealed in the course of such a report, unless the 24    institution determines that the violation was egregious, 25    including without limitation an action that places the 26    health or safety of any other person at significant or   HB4990 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    serious risk.2        (11) A statement of the higher education institution's 3    prohibition on retaliation against those who, in good 4    faith, report or disclose an alleged violation of the 5    comprehensive policy, file a complaint, or otherwise 6    participate in the complaint resolution procedure and 7    available sanctions for individuals who engage in 8    retaliatory conduct.9    (b) On or before August 1, 2027, each higher education 10institution shall update its comprehensive policy to ensure 11compliance with this amendatory Act of the 104th General 12Assembly.13    (c) Each higher education institution shall act in 14accordance with its comprehensive policy. Beginning August 1, 152027, any party that is aggrieved by the failure of a higher 16education institution to respond to conduct that violates the 17higher education institution's comprehensive policy or the 18substantial failure of a higher education institution to act 19in accordance with its comprehensive policy may bring a civil 20lawsuit. The lawsuit must be brought no later than 7 years 21after the alleged violation of the comprehensive policy or 7 22years after the date the aggrieved party becomes aware of the 23alleged violation, whichever is later. If the court finds that 24a higher education institution willfully violated its 25comprehensive policy or willfully disregarded the safety of 26the aggrieved party, the court may award actual and punitive   HB4990 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1damages. The court, as it deems appropriate, may grant, as 2relief, a permanent or preliminary negative or mandatory 3injunction, temporary restraining order, or other order.4    Upon a motion, a court shall award reasonable attorney's 5fees and costs, including expert witness fees and other 6litigation expenses, to a plaintiff who is a prevailing party 7in any action brought under this subsection (c). In awarding 8reasonable attorney's fees, the court shall consider the 9degree to which the relief obtained relates to the relief 10sought. 11    Nothing in this Section may be construed to require an 12exhaustion of the administrative complaint process before 13civil law remedies may be pursued.14(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15; 99-741, eff. 8-5-16; 15100-1087, eff. 1-1-19.) 16    (110 ILCS 155/15)17    Sec. 15. Student notification of rights and options. 18    (a) Upon On or before August 1, 2016, upon being notified 19of an alleged violation of the comprehensive policy by or on 20behalf of a student, each higher education institution shall, 21at a minimum, provide the survivor, when identified, with a 22concise notification, written in plain language, of the 23survivor's rights and options, including without limitation:24        (1) the survivor's right to report or not report the 25    alleged incident to the higher education institution, law   HB4990 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    enforcement, or both, including information about the 2    survivor's right to privacy and which reporting methods 3    are confidential, as well as the survivor's right to 4    participate or not participate in any investigation into 5    the alleged incident;6        (2) the contact information for the higher education 7    institution's Title IX coordinator or coordinators, 8    confidential advisors, a community-based sexual assault 9    crisis center, campus law enforcement, and local law 10    enforcement;11        (3) the survivor's right to request and receive 12    assistance from campus authorities in notifying law 13    enforcement;14        (4) the survivor's ability to request interim 15    protective and supportive measures and accommodations for 16    survivors, including without limitation changes to 17    academic, living, dining, working, and transportation 18    situations and , obtaining and enforcing a campus-issued 19    order of protection or no contact order, if such 20    protective and supportive measures and accommodations are 21    reasonably available, and an order of protection or no 22    contact order in State court;23        (5) the higher education institution's ability to 24    provide assistance, upon the survivor's request, in 25    accessing and navigating campus and local health and 26    mental health services, counseling, and advocacy services;   HB4990 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    and2        (6) a summary of the higher education institution's 3    complaint resolution procedures, under Section 25 of this 4    Act, if the survivor reports a violation of the 5    comprehensive policy; and .6        (7) information about how the higher education 7    institution prohibits and responds to retaliation and the 8    process for reporting retaliation under the comprehensive 9    policy. 10    (b) Within 12 hours after receiving an electronic report 11or by the next business day for other reports, the higher 12education institution shall respond to the electronic 13reporter. If the reporter is not the survivor, the higher 14education institution shall also contact the survivor, if 15known, by the next business day following receipt of the 16report. The separate responses to the reporter and the 17survivor must and, at a minimum, provide the information 18described in subdivisions (1) through (7) (6) of subsection 19(a) of this Section and a list of available resources. The 20higher education institution may choose the manner in which it 21responds including, but not limited to, through verbal or 22electronic communication. Nothing in this subsection (b) 23limits a higher education institution's obligations under 24subsection (a) of this Section.25(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15.)   HB4990 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    (110 ILCS 155/20)2    Sec. 20. Confidential advisor.3    (a) Each higher education institution shall provide 4students with access to confidential advisors to provide 5emergency and ongoing support to survivors of sexual violence.6    (b) The confidential advisors may not be individuals on 7campus who are designated as responsible employees under Title 8IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972. Nothing in 9this Section precludes a higher education institution from 10partnering with a community-based sexual assault crisis center 11to provide confidential advisors.12    (b-5) A confidential advisor is separate from a complaint 13advisor, unless the complainant and confidential advisor agree 14to have the confidential advisor also serve as the complaint 15advisor. Unless prohibited by Title IX of the federal 16Education Amendments of 1972 or other federal law, a 17complainant has a right to have both a support person, which 18may be the confidential advisor if the person so chooses, and a 19complaint advisor at any meeting or proceeding related to an 20alleged violation of the comprehensive policy or under Title 21IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972. The higher 22education institution must not require or appoint a 23confidential advisor to serve as the complainant's complaint 24advisor. 25    (c) All confidential advisors shall receive 40 hours of 26training on sexual violence, if they have not already   HB4990 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1completed this 40-hour training, before being designated a 2confidential advisor and shall attend a minimum of 6 hours of 3ongoing education training annually on issues related to 4sexual violence to remain a confidential advisor. Confidential 5advisors shall also receive periodic training on the campus 6administrative processes, interim protective and supportive 7measures and accommodations, and complaint resolution 8procedures.9    (d) In the course of working with a survivor, each 10confidential advisor shall, at a minimum, do all of the 11following:12        (1) Inform the survivor of the survivor's choice of 13    possible next steps regarding the survivor's reporting 14    options and possible outcomes, including without 15    limitation reporting pursuant to the higher education 16    institution's comprehensive policy and notifying local law 17    enforcement.18        (2) Notify the survivor of resources and services for 19    survivors of sexual violence, including, but not limited 20    to, student services available on campus and through 21    community-based resources, including without limitation 22    sexual assault crisis centers, medical treatment 23    facilities, counseling services, legal resources, medical 24    forensic services, and mental health services. A 25    confidential advisor must inform the survivor if 26    requesting or receiving certain resources or services may   HB4990 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    affect confidentiality. 2        (3) Inform the survivor of the survivor's rights and 3    the higher education institution's responsibilities 4    regarding orders of protection, no contact orders, or 5    similar lawful orders issued by the higher education 6    institution or a criminal or civil court.7        (4) Provide confidential services to and have 8    privileged, confidential communications with survivors of 9    sexual violence in accordance with Section 8-804 of the 10    Code of Civil Procedure.11        (5) Upon the survivor's request and as appropriate, 12    liaise with campus officials, community-based sexual 13    assault crisis centers, or local law enforcement and, if 14    requested, assist the survivor with contacting and 15    reporting to campus officials, campus law enforcement, or 16    local law enforcement. A confidential advisor must inform 17    the survivor if requesting or receiving certain resources 18    or services may affect confidentiality. 19        (6) Upon the survivor's request, liaise with the 20    necessary campus authorities to secure interim protective 21    and supportive measures and accommodations for the 22    survivor. 23        (7) Upon the survivor's request, liaise with the 24    necessary campus authorities to assist the survivor in 25    responding to and advocating against any retaliation by 26    the respondent or any other individual, including agents   HB4990 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    of the higher education institution. 2(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15.) 3    (110 ILCS 155/25)4    Sec. 25. Complaint resolution procedures.5    (a) On or before August 1, 2016, each campus of a higher 6education institution shall adopt one procedure to resolve 7complaints of alleged student violations of the comprehensive 8policy.9    (b) For each campus, a higher education institution's 10complaint resolution procedures for allegations of student 11violation of the comprehensive policy shall provide, at a 12minimum, all of the following:13        (1) Complainants and respondents alleging student 14    violation of the comprehensive policy shall have the right 15    to have opportunity to request that the complaint 16    resolution procedure begin promptly and be completed 17    within 120 days after the complaint was received by the 18    higher education institution. A reasonable extension of 19    this timeframe is allowed on a case-by-case basis for good 20    cause, with notice to the parties that includes the reason 21    for the delay. Written notification must be provided to 22    the complainant and the respondent if the complaint 23    resolution procedure extends beyond 120 days. Both parties 24    shall have the right to the consideration of any 25    additional protective and supportive measures that may be   HB4990 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    necessary due to a delay in the complaint resolution 2    procedure proceed in a timely manner.3        (2) The higher education institution shall determine 4    the individuals who will resolve complaints of alleged 5    student violations of the comprehensive policy.6        (3) All individuals whose duties include resolution of 7    complaints of student violations of the comprehensive 8    policy shall receive a minimum of 8 to 10 hours of annual 9    training on issues related to sexual violence, domestic 10    violence, dating violence, and stalking, and sexual 11    harassment and how to conduct the higher education 12    institution's complaint resolution procedures, in addition 13    to the annual training required for employees as provided 14    in subsection (c) of Section 30 of this Act. The initial 15    training must be completed prior to such individuals 16    participating in the investigation of or resolution of 17    complaints. 18        (4) The higher education institution shall have a 19    sufficient number of individuals trained to resolve 20    complaints so that (i) a substitution can occur in the 21    case of a conflict of interest or recusal and (ii) an 22    individual or individuals with no prior involvement in the 23    initial determination or finding hear any appeal brought 24    by a party. 25        (4.5) The higher education institution may consolidate 26    complaints by a complainant against more than one   HB4990 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    respondent or by more than one complainant against one or 2    more respondents if the allegations arise out of the same 3    facts or circumstances if the higher education institution 4    provides the complainant with a timely written notice of 5    its intent to consolidate and offers the complainant a 6    reasonable opportunity to respond. However, in a 7    consolidated complaint resolution proceeding, the 8    individual or individuals resolving the complaints must 9    take reasonable measures to protect the privacy of each 10    complainant and respondent. 11        (5) The individual or individuals resolving a 12    complaint shall use a preponderance of the evidence 13    standard to determine whether the alleged violation of the 14    comprehensive policy occurred. 15        (6) The complainant and respondent shall (i) receive 16    notice of the individual or individuals with authority to 17    make a finding or impose a sanction in their proceeding 18    before the individual or individuals initiate contact with 19    either party and (ii) have the opportunity to request a 20    substitution if the participation of an individual with 21    authority to make a finding or impose a sanction poses a 22    conflict of interest. 23        (7) The higher education institution shall have a 24    procedure to determine interim protective and supportive 25    measures and accommodations available pending the 26    resolution of the complaint. Such protective and   HB4990 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    supportive measures must not be overly burdensome to 2    either party or result in excluding either party from 3    participation in, denying either party the benefits of, or 4    subjecting either party to discrimination under any 5    education program or activity or otherwise interfere with 6    any right or privilege secured by this Act or Title IX of 7    the federal Education Amendments of 1972. 8        Nothing in this Section prohibits a higher education 9    institution from following its emergency or regular 10    removal or expulsion processes. 11        If the higher education institution determines that, 12    to provide reasonable protective and supportive measures, 13    it must burden either the complainant or the respondent, 14    the higher education institution must minimize the burden 15    on the complainant to the extent possible, unless the 16    higher education institution is obligated to address the 17    protective and supportive measures under Title IX of the 18    federal Education Amendments of 1972 and Title IX requires 19    burdening the complainant instead of the respondent. 20        The higher education institution shall bear the cost 21    of reasonable protective and supportive measures. The 22    higher education institution shall have a procedure for 23    providing reasonable protective and supportive measures to 24    all students who report sexual violence, domestic 25    violence, dating violence, stalking, and sexual 26    harassment. Such protective and supportive measures shall   HB4990 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    be available even if a student does not file a formal 2    complaint, the student's complaint is dismissed, or there 3    is no finding of responsibility in the complaint 4    resolution procedure. 5        Protective and supportive measures may include, but 6    are not limited to, counseling, extensions of deadlines, 7    granting requests to change enrollment options after 8    deadlines and other course-related adjustments, campus 9    escort services, increased security and monitoring of 10    certain areas of the campus, campus no contact orders and 11    honoring protective orders entered by a civil or criminal 12    court, leaves of absence to seek medical care, legal 13    assistance, counseling, safety planning, advocacy, or 14    other assistance without penalty from the higher education 15    institution, excused absences to attend, participate in, 16    or prepare for a court, campus, administrative, or 17    quasi-judicial proceeding, training and education programs 18    related to sexual violence, domestic violence, dating 19    violence, stalking, or sexual harassment, and changes in a 20    class schedule, a campus employment or work schedule, 21    housing, or an extracurricular or other activity. 22        A higher education institution must make a good faith 23    effort to accommodate requests for reasonable protective 24    and supportive measures. Each request for protective and 25    supportive measures must be evaluated on an individualized 26    basis to determine the reasonableness of the request, and,   HB4990 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    if the original request is determined to be unreasonable, 2    the higher education institution must consider alternative 3    reasonable protective and supportive measures to address 4    the party's needs. The major or course enrolled in by the 5    party, on its own, is not a reason to deny protective and 6    supportive measures. If the higher education institution 7    cannot grant a survivor's request and a comparable 8    alternative is not available, the higher education 9    institution must consider whether there are any other 10    reasonably available options that could support the 11    survivor or meet the survivor's needs and offer those 12    options to the survivor. 13        (8) Any proceeding, meeting, or hearing held to 14    resolve complaints of alleged student violations of the 15    comprehensive policy shall protect the privacy of the 16    participating parties and witnesses. 17        (9) The complainant, regardless of this person's level 18    of involvement in the complaint resolution procedure, and 19    the respondent shall have the opportunity to provide or 20    present evidence and witnesses on their behalf during the 21    complaint resolution procedure. 22        (9.5) The higher education institution may not 23    distribute any evidence that includes a private or 24    intentionally digitally altered sexual image by physical 25    or electronic means, except as required by law, a 26    subpoena, or a court order. The complainant, the   HB4990 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    respondent, and each party's complaint advisor shall have 2    the opportunity to view physical or electronic copies of 3    any private or intentionally digitally altered sexual 4    image evidence in person in a higher education institution 5    office and only in the presence of the individual 6    resolving the complaint, a Title IX coordinator or a 7    member of the Title IX coordinator's staff, or the legal 8    counsel representing the higher education institution. If 9    either party is unable to view this evidence in person, 10    that party and the party's complainant advisor may view it 11    temporarily via an electronic procedure established by the 12    higher education institution that ensures confidentiality. 13    Each party and each party's complaint advisor must not 14    create physical or electronic copies of private or 15    intentionally digitally altered sexual image evidence. All 16    private or intentionally digitally altered sexual image 17    evidence must be kept in the strictest of confidence by 18    the higher education institution and its employees during 19    and after the completion of the complaint resolution 20    procedure, and evidence shall be retained as required 21    under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy 22    Act of 1974. 23        (10) The complainant, and the respondent, and each 24    party's complaint advisor may not directly question the 25    other party cross examine one another, but may, at the 26    discretion and direction of the individual or individuals   HB4990 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    resolving the complaint, suggest questions to be posed to 2    the other party by the individual or individuals resolving 3    the complaint and respond to the other party. This 4    prohibition on direct questioning does not apply to any 5    complaint resolution procedure that involves a complaint 6    that the higher education institution is obligated to 7    address under Title IX of the federal Education Amendments 8    of 1972 if, at the time of the complaint resolution 9    procedure, Title IX rules require allowing 10    cross-examination by the parties' complaint advisors. If 11    Title IX rules require allowing cross-examination by the 12    parties' complaint advisors, the higher education 13    institution must appoint a complaint advisor for any party 14    that does not have one. 15        (11) Both parties may request and must be allowed to 16    have a complaint an advisor of their choice accompany them 17    to any meeting or proceeding related to an alleged 18    violation of the comprehensive policy, provided that the 19    involvement of the complaint advisor does not result in 20    undue delay of the meeting or proceeding. The complaint 21    advisor must comply with any rules in the higher education 22    institution's complaint resolution procedure regarding the 23    advisor's role. If the complaint advisor violates the 24    rules or engages in behavior or advocacy that harasses, 25    abuses, or intimidates either party, a witness, or an 26    individual resolving the complaint, that advisor may be   HB4990 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    prohibited from further participation. 2        (12) The complainant and the respondent may not be 3    compelled to testify, if the complaint resolution 4    procedure involves a hearing, in the presence of the other 5    party. If a party invokes this right, the higher education 6    institution shall provide a procedure by which each party 7    can, at a minimum, hear the other party's testimony. 8        (12.5) Survivors of sexual violence, domestic 9    violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual harassment 10    have a right to have a support person of their choosing, 11    including a confidential advisor, at any meeting or 12    proceeding related to an alleged violation of the 13    comprehensive policy or under Title IX of the federal 14    Education Amendments of 1972. If a support person violates 15    the rules or engages in behavior that harasses, abuses, or 16    intimidates either party, a witness, or an individual 17    resolving the complaint, that support person may be 18    prohibited from further participation. Nothing in this 19    paragraph (12.5) prohibits a higher education institution 20    from allowing respondents to have their own support 21    person. 22        (13) The complainant and the respondent are entitled 23    to simultaneous, written notification of the results of 24    the complaint resolution procedure, including information 25    regarding appeal rights, within 7 days of a decision or 26    sooner if required by State or federal law.   HB4990 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1        (14) The complainant and the respondent shall, at a 2    minimum, have the right to timely appeal the complaint 3    resolution procedure's findings or imposed sanctions if 4    the party alleges (i) a procedural error occurred, (ii) 5    new information exists that would substantially change the 6    outcome of the finding, or (iii) the sanction is 7    disproportionate with the violation. The individual or 8    individuals reviewing the findings or imposed sanctions 9    shall not have participated previously in the complaint 10    resolution procedure and shall not have a conflict of 11    interest with either party. The complainant and the 12    respondent shall receive written notice of an appeal and 13    the alleged grounds for appeal within 7 days after the 14    appeal was submitted to the higher education institution, 15    and the nonappealing party shall be provided an 16    opportunity to submit a response to the higher education 17    institution. The complainant and the respondent shall 18    receive notice of the appeal decision in writing within 7 19    days after the conclusion of the review of findings or 20    sanctions or sooner if required by federal or State law. 21        (15) The higher education institution shall not 22    disclose the identity of the complainant survivor or the 23    respondent, except as necessary to resolve the complaint 24    or to implement interim protective and supportive measures 25    and accommodations or when provided by State or federal 26    law.   HB4990 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15.) 2    (110 ILCS 155/30)3    Sec. 30. Campus training, education, and awareness.4    (a) On or before August 1, 2016, a higher education 5institution shall prominently publish, timely update, and have 6easily available on its Internet website all of the following 7information:8        (1) The higher education institution's comprehensive 9    policy, as well as options and resources available to 10    survivors.11        (2) The higher education institution's student 12    notification of rights and options described in Section 15 13    of this Act.14        (3) The name and contact information for all of the 15    higher education institution's Title IX coordinators.16        (4) An explanation of the role of (i) Title IX 17    coordinators, including deputy or assistant Title IX 18    coordinators, under Title IX of the federal Education 19    Amendments of 1972, (ii) responsible employees under Title 20    IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972, (iii) 21    campus security authorities under the federal Jeanne Clery 22    Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime 23    Statistics Act, and (iv) mandated reporters under the 24    Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act and the reporting 25    obligations of each, as well as the level of   HB4990 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    confidentiality each is allowed to provide to reporting 2    students under relevant federal and State law.3        (5) The name, title, and contact information for all 4    confidential advisors, counseling services, and 5    confidential resources that can provide a confidential 6    response to a report and a description of what 7    confidential reporting means.8        (6) The telephone number and website URL for 9    community-based, State, and national hotlines providing 10    information to sexual violence survivors.11    (b) Beginning with the 2016-2017 academic year, each 12higher education institution shall provide sexual violence 13primary prevention and awareness programming for all students 14who attend one or more classes on campus, which shall include, 15at a minimum, annual training as described in this subsection 16(b). Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit the 17higher education institution's ability to conduct additional 18ongoing sexual violence primary prevention and awareness 19programming.20    Each higher education institution's annual training shall, 21at a minimum, provide each student who attends one or more 22classes on campus information regarding the higher education 23institution's comprehensive policy, including without 24limitation the following:25        (1) the institution's definitions of consent, 26    inability to consent, and retaliation as they relate to   HB4990 Engrossed- 31 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    sexual violence;2        (2) reporting to the higher education institution, 3    campus law enforcement, and local law enforcement;4        (3) reporting to the confidential advisor or other 5    confidential resources;6        (4) available survivor services; and7        (5) strategies for bystander intervention and risk 8    reduction.9    At the beginning of each academic year, each higher 10education institution shall provide each student of the higher 11education institution with an electronic copy or hard copy of 12its comprehensive policy, procedures, and related protocols.13    (c) A Beginning in the 2016-2017 academic year, a higher 14education institution shall provide annual survivor-centered 15and trauma-informed response training to any employee of the 16higher education institution who is involved in (i) the 17receipt of a student report of an alleged incident of sexual 18violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking, or 19sexual harassment, (ii) the referral or provision of services 20to a survivor, or (iii) any campus complaint resolution 21procedure that results from an alleged incident of sexual 22violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking, or 23sexual harassment. Employees falling under this description 24include without limitation the Title IX coordinator, members 25of the higher education institution's campus law enforcement, 26and campus security. An enrolled student at or a contracted   HB4990 Engrossed- 32 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1service provider of the higher education institution with the 2employee responsibilities outlined in clauses (i) through 3(iii) of this paragraph shall also receive annual 4survivor-centered and trauma-informed response training.5    The higher education institution shall design the training 6to improve the trainee's ability to understand (i) the higher 7education institution's comprehensive policy; (ii) the 8relevant federal and State law concerning survivors of sexual 9violence, domestic violence, dating violence, and stalking, 10and sexual harassment at higher education institutions; (iii) 11the roles of the higher education institution, medical 12providers, law enforcement, and community agencies in ensuring 13a coordinated response to a reported incident of sexual 14violence; (iv) the effects of trauma on a survivor; (v) the 15types of conduct that constitute sexual violence, domestic 16violence, dating violence, and stalking, and sexual 17harassment, including same-sex violence and digital sexual 18harassment; and (vi) consent and the role drugs and alcohol 19use can have on the ability to consent. The training shall also 20seek to improve the trainee's ability to respond with cultural 21sensitivity; provide services to or assist in locating 22services for a survivor, as appropriate; and communicate 23sensitively and compassionately with a survivor of sexual 24violence, domestic violence, dating violence, or stalking, or 25sexual harassment.26(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15.)   HB4990 Engrossed- 33 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 2changing Section 8-804 as follows: 3    (735 ILCS 5/8-804)4    Sec. 8-804. Confidential advisor.5    (a) This Section is intended to protect students at higher 6education institutions in this State who are survivors of 7sexual violence, domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, 8or sexual harassment from public disclosure of communications 9they make in confidence to confidential advisors. Because of 10the fear, stigma, and trauma that often result from incidents 11of gender-based sexual violence, many survivors hesitate to 12report or seek help, even when it is available at no cost to 13them. As a result, they not only fail to receive needed medical 14care and emergency counseling, but may lack the psychological 15support necessary to report the incident of sexual violence to 16the higher education institution or law enforcement.17    (b) In this Section:18    "Confidential advisor" means a person who is employed or 19contracted by a higher education institution to provide 20emergency and ongoing support to survivors of sexual violence 21with the training, duties, and responsibilities described in 22Section 20 of the Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher 23Education Act.24    "Dating violence" has the meaning given to that term in   HB4990 Engrossed- 34 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1the Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher Education Act.2    "Domestic violence" has the meaning given to that term in 3the Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher Education Act.4    "Gender-based violence" means sexual violence, domestic 5violence, dating violence, stalking, or sexual harassment. 6    "Higher education institution" means a public university, 7a public community college, or an independent, not-for-profit 8or for-profit higher education institution located in this 9State.10    "Sexual harassment" has the meaning given to that term in 11the Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher Education Act. 12    "Sexual violence" has the meaning given to that term in 13the Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher Education Act means 14physical sexual acts attempted or perpetrated against a 15person's will or when a person is incapable of giving consent, 16including without limitation rape, sexual assault, sexual 17battery, sexual abuse, and sexual coercion.18    "Stalking" has the meaning given to that term in the 19Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher Education Act. 20    "Survivor" has the meaning given to that term in the 21Preventing Sexual Violence in Higher Education Act means a 22student who has experienced sexual violence while enrolled at 23a higher education institution. 24    (c) All communications between a confidential advisor and 25a survivor pertaining to an incident of sexual violence shall 26remain confidential, unless the survivor consents to the   HB4990 Engrossed- 35 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1disclosure of the communication in writing, the disclosure 2falls within one of the exceptions outlined in subsection (d) 3of this Section, or failure to disclose the communication 4would violate State or federal law. Communications include all 5records kept by the confidential advisor in the course of 6providing the survivor with services related to the incident 7of sexual violence.8    (d) The confidential advisor may disclose confidential 9communications between the confidential advisor and the 10survivor if failure to disclose would result in a clear, 11imminent risk of serious physical injury to or death of the 12survivor or another person.13    The confidential advisor shall have no obligation to 14report crimes to the higher education institution or law 15enforcement, except to report to the Title IX coordinator, as 16defined by Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 171972, on a monthly basis the number and type of incidents of 18sexual violence, domestic violence, dating violence, stalking, 19and sexual harassment reported exclusively to the confidential 20advisor in accordance with the higher education institution's 21reporting requirements under subsection (b) of Section 9.21 of 22the Board of Higher Education Act and under federal law.23    If, in any judicial proceeding, a party alleges that the 24communications are necessary to the determination of any issue 25before the court and written consent to disclosure has not 26been given, the party may ask the court to consider ordering   HB4990 Engrossed- 36 -LRB104 18294 LNS 31734 b1the disclosure of the communications. In such a case, 2communications may be disclosed if the court finds, after in 3camera examination of the communication, that the 4communication is relevant, probative, and not unduly 5prejudicial or inflammatory or is otherwise clearly 6admissible; that other evidence is demonstrably unsatisfactory 7as evidence of the facts sought to be established by the 8communication or communications; and that disclosure is more 9important to the interests of substantial justice than 10protection from injury to the confidential advisor-survivor 11relationship, to the survivor, or to any other individual whom 12disclosure is likely to harm.13    (e) This privilege shall not preclude an individual from 14asserting a greater privilege under federal or State law that 15applies.16(Source: P.A. 99-426, eff. 8-21-15.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 182027.